Nebraska, session 109, LB645A.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated (1) $40,000 from the School
Expense Fund and $26,000 from the State Patrol Expense Fund for FY2025-26 and
(2) $-0- from the School Expense Fund and $-0- from the State Patrol Expense
Fund for FY2026-27 to the Public Employees Retirement Board, for Program 41, to
aid in carrying out the provisions of Legislative Bill 645, One Hundred Ninth
Legislature, First Session, 2025.
Total expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems from
funds appropriated in this section shall not exceed $20,000 for FY2025-26 or
$-0- for FY2026-27.
Sec. 2. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when passed and
approved according to law.
-1-